Illinois, session 104th, HB1025.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-1-10 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/1-1-10)  (from Ch. 24, par. 1-1-10)7    Sec. 1-1-10. It is the policy of this State that all powers 8granted, either expressly or by necessary implication, by this 9Code, by Illinois statute, or by the Illinois Constitution to 10municipalities may be exercised by those municipalities and 11the officers, employees, and agents of each, notwithstanding 12effects on competition.13    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 14except for the powers to tax, to impose fees, and to incur 15debt, non-home rule municipalities shall exercise all of the 16powers provided to home rule units under Section 6 of Article 17VII of the Illinois Constitution, subject to the limitations 18set forth in that Section. 19    It is further the policy of this State that home rule 20municipalities and the officers, employees, and agents of each 21may (1) exercise any power and perform any function pertaining 22to their government and affairs or (2) exercise those powers 23within traditional areas of municipal activity, except as   HB1025- 2 -LRB104 03176 RTM 13197 b1limited by the Illinois Constitution or a proper limiting 2statute, notwithstanding effects on competition.3    It is the intention of the General Assembly that the 4"State action exemption" to the application of federal 5antitrust statutes be fully available to all municipalities 6and the agents, officers, and employees of each to the extent 7they are exercising authority as aforesaid, including, but not 8limited to, the provisions of Sections 6, 7, and 10 of Article 9VII of the Illinois Constitution or the provisions of the 10following Illinois statutes, as each is now in existence or 11may hereinafter be amended:12        (a) The Illinois Local Library Act; Article 27 of the 13    Property Tax Code; the Housing Development and 14    Construction Act; or the Housing Authorities Act, the 15    Housing Cooperation Law, the Blighted Vacant Areas 16    Development Act of 1949, the Urban Community Conservation 17    Act, the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, or any other power 18    exercised pursuant to the Intergovernmental Cooperation 19    Act; or20        (b) Divisions 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 6 of Article 7 of the 21    Illinois Municipal Code; Divisions 9, 10, and 11 of 22    Article 8 of the Illinois Municipal Code; Divisions 1, 2, 23    3, 4, and 5 of Article 9 of the Illinois Municipal Code; 24    and all of Divisions of Articles 10 and 11 of the Illinois 25    Municipal Code; or26        (c) Any other Illinois statute or constitutional   HB1025- 3 -LRB104 03176 RTM 13197 b1    provision now existing or which may be enacted in the 2    future, by which any municipality may exercise authority.3    The "State action exemption" for which provision is made 4by this Section shall be liberally construed in favor of such 5municipalities and the agents, employees, and officers 6thereof, and such exemption shall be available notwithstanding 7that the action of the municipality or its agents, officers, 8or employees constitutes an irregular exercise of 9constitutional or statutory powers. However, this exemption 10shall not apply where the action alleged to be in violation of 11antitrust law exceeds either (1) powers granted, either 12expressly or by necessary implication, by Illinois statute or 13the Illinois Constitution or (2) powers granted to a home rule 14municipality to perform any function pertaining to its 15government and affairs or to act within traditional areas of 16municipal activity, except as limited by the Illinois 17Constitution or a proper limiting statute.18    Notwithstanding the foregoing, where it is alleged that a 19violation of the antitrust laws has occurred, the relief 20available to the plaintiffs shall be limited to an injunction 21which enjoins the alleged activity.22    Nothing in this Section is intended to prohibit or limit 23any cause of action other than under an antitrust theory.24(Source: P.A. 102-510, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.